Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3002
Wind agreement; limit on term; termination, when.

A wind agreement shall run with the land benefited and burdened and shall terminate upon the conditions stated in the wind agreement, except that the initial term of a wind agreement shall not exceed forty years. A wind agreement shall terminate if development of a wind energy conversion system as defined in section 66-909.02 has not commenced within ten years after the effective date of the wind agreement, except that this period may be extended by mutual agreement of the parties to the wind agreement.

Laws 2009, LB568, § 2.